Illinois, session 104th, SB3784.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Income Tax Act is amended by 5adding Section 246 as follows: 6    (35 ILCS 5/246 new)7    Sec. 246. Donations of real property for employee child 8care.9    (a) For taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 102027, a taxpayer that makes a qualified donation of real 11property during the taxable year to an employer that will use 12the property for the purpose of providing onsite child care to 13its employees is entitled to a credit against the tax imposed 14by subsections (a) and (b) of Section 201 in an amount equal to 15the fair market value of the property. A taxpayer is not 16entitled to a credit under this Section if the donation of real 17property is made to a related member of the taxpayer. Fair 18market value shall be determined in accordance with rules 19adopted by the Department. 20    (b) In no event shall a credit under this Section reduce 21the taxpayer's liability to less than zero. If the amount of 22the credit exceeds the tax liability for the year, the excess 23may be carried forward and applied to the tax liability of the   SB3784- 2 -LRB104 19629 HLH 33078 b110 taxable years following the excess credit year. The tax 2credit shall be applied to the earliest year for which there is 3a tax liability. If there are credits for more than one year 4that are available to offset a liability, the earlier credit 5shall be applied first. 6    For partners and shareholders of Subchapter S 7corporations, the provisions of Section 251 shall apply with 8respect to the credit under this Section. 9    (c) As used in this Section: 10    "Related member" means a person that, with respect to the 11taxpayer at the time the donation is made, is any one of the 12following: 13        (1) An individual stockholder, if the stockholder and 14    the members of the stockholder's family (as defined in 15    Section 318 of the Internal Revenue Code) own directly, 16    indirectly, beneficially, or constructively, in the 17    aggregate, at least 50% of the value of the taxpayer's 18    outstanding stock. 19        (2) A partnership, estate, or trust and any partner or 20    beneficiary, if the partnership, estate, or trust, and its 21    partners or beneficiaries own directly, indirectly, 22    beneficially, or constructively, in the aggregate, at 23    least 50% of the profits, capital, stock, or value of the 24    taxpayer. 25        (3) A corporation, and any party related to the 26    corporation in a manner that would require an attribution   SB3784- 3 -LRB104 19629 HLH 33078 b1    of stock from the corporation to the party or from the 2    party to the corporation under the attribution rules of 3    Section 318 of the Internal Revenue Code, if the taxpayer 4    owns directly, indirectly, beneficially, or constructively 5    at least 50% of the value of the corporation's outstanding 6    stock. 7        (4) A corporation and any party related to that 8    corporation in a manner that would require an attribution 9    of stock from the corporation to the party or from the 10    party to the corporation under the attribution rules of 11    Section 318 of the Internal Revenue Code, if the 12    corporation and all such related parties own in the 13    aggregate at least 50% of the profits, capital, stock, or 14    value of the taxpayer. 15        (5) A person to or from whom there is attribution of 16    stock ownership in accordance with Section 1563(e) of the 17    Internal Revenue Code, except, for purposes of determining 18    whether a person is a related member under this paragraph, 19    20% shall be substituted for 5% wherever 5% appears in 20    Section 1563(e) of the Internal Revenue Code.